en: Thousand Island dressings, Thousand Island dressing
xx: Thousand Island
ar: صلصة ثاوزند أيلاند
cs: Omáčka Tisíc ostrovů
da: Thousand Island-dressinger
de: Thousand-Island-Dressing
eo: Mil-Insula salatosaŭcoj
es: Salsa mil islas
fa: سس هزار جزیره
fr: Mille-îles
hu: Ezersziget öntet
hy: Հազար կղզիներ
it: Salsa Thousand Island
ja: サウザンドアイランドドレッシング
jv: Saos sewu pulo
ko: 사우전드 아일랜드 드레싱
nb: Thousand Island-dressinger
nl: Thousand-Island-dressing
nn: Thousand Island-dressingar
pl: Sos tysiąca wysp
ru: Тысяча островов
sk: Omáčka Tisíc ostrovov
sv: Thousand Island-dressingar
th: น้ำสลัดเทาซันด์ไอแลนด์
uk: Тисяча островів
zh: 千島醬

en: Sesame dressings
da: Sesamdressinger
fr: Sauces salade au sésame
nb: Sesamdressinger
nn: Sesamdressingar
sv: Sesamdressingar

en: Vinaigrettes
de: Vinaigretten
es: Vinagretas, Salsas vinagreta, Salsas vinagretas
fi: vinaigretet
fr: Vinaigrettes, Sauces vinaigrettes, Sauces vinaigrette
hr: Vinogrete
it: Vinaigrette, Pinzimonio
ja: ヴィネグレットソース, フレンチドレッシング
nl: Vinaigrettedressings
pl: Winegret, Vinaigrette
ru: Винегреты

en: Salad dressing with 50-75% of oil
fr: Sauce vinaigrette avec 50 à 75% d'huile

en: Low-fat vinaigrette dressings, Salad dressing with reduced fat and 25-50% of oil
fr: Vinaigrettes allégées en matières grasses, Vinaigrette allégée en matières grasses, vinaigrettes allégées, Sauce vinaigrette allégée en matière grasse avec 25 à 50% d'huile
nl: Vinaigrette lightdressings

en: Mustard sauces, Mustard sauce
de: Senfsoßen
es: Salsa de mostaza
fr: Sauces moutarde
hr: Umaci od senfa
lt: Garstyčių padažai
nl: Mosterdsauzen, Mosterdsaus
pl: Sosy musztardowe, sos musztardowy

en: Barbecue sauces, BBQ sauces
bg: Сос барбекю
de: Barbecuesaucen, BBQ-Saucen
es: Salsa barbacoa
fi: Barbeque-kastikkeet, BBQ-kastikkeet
fr: Sauces barbecue, Sauces BBQ
hr: Umaci za roštilj
hu: Barbecue mártások, Barbecue szószok, BBQ mártások
it: Salse barbecue
ja: バーベキューソース
lt: Barbekiu padažai
nl: Barbecuesauzen
pl: Sosy barbecue, Sos barbecue, Sosy BBQ

en: Mint sauces
de: Minzsaucen
fr: Sauces à la menthe
hr: Umaci od mente
hu: Menta szószok
lt: Mėtų padažai
nl: Muntsauzen

fr: Sauces andalouses, sauce andalouse
ja: アルマンドソース

en: Brown sauces
de: Braune Saucen
fr: Sauces brunes
hr: Smeđi umaci
ja: ブラウンソース
lt: Rudieji padažai
nl: Bruine sauzen

en: Curry sauces
da: Karrysovser, Karrysovse, Karrysaucer
de: Currysaucen
es: Salsas de curry
fi: currykastikkeet
fr: Sauces au curry, Sauces curry
hr: Curry umaci
hu: Curry mártások
it: Salse al curry
ja: カレーソース
lt: Kario padažai
nb: Karisauser
nl: Kerriesauzen, Kerriesaus, Currysauzen
nn: Karisausar
sv: Currysåser

en: Harissa sauces, Hot spicy sauce
de: Harissa-Soßen
fi: Harissat
fr: Harissas, Sauces harissa, harissa, sauce harissa, Sauce condimentaire harissa
hr: Harissa umaci
it: Salse Harissa, Salsa piccante calda
nl: Harissa sauzen, Harissa saus

en: Algerian-style sauces, Algerian sauces
de: Algerische Saucen
fr: Sauces algériennes
hr: Umaci na alžirski način
lt: Alžyro padažai
zh: 阿尔及利亚酱

en: Oyster sauces
de: Austernsaucen
es: Salsa de ostras
fi: Osterikastikkeet
fr: Sauces à l'huitre, sauce à l'huitre, sauce d'huitre, sauce huitre
hr: Umaci od kamenica
ja: オイスターソース
lt: Austrių padažai
nl: Oestersauzen
pl: Sosy ostrygowe, Sos ostrygowy

en: Madère sauces, Madeira wine sauces
fr: Sauces Madère, Sauce madère
hr: Madère umaci
nl: Medeirasauzen

en: Samourai sauces
es: Salsa Samourai
fr: Sauces samouraï
hr: Samurai umaci
it: Salse Samourai
nl: Samouraisauzen

en: Pita sauces
fr: Sauces Pita
hr: Pita umaci
lt: Pita padažai
nl: Pitasausen

en: Indian-style sauces, Indian sauces
de: Indische Saucen
fr: Sauces indiennes, Sauce indienne
hr: Umaci na indijski način
hu: Indiai mártások
lt: Indiški padažai
nl: Indiaase sauzen

en: Tikka masala sauce, garam masala sauce
de: Tikka Masala Saucen
fr: Sauces tikka masala, Sauce indienne tikka masala
hr: Tikka masala umak
ja: ティッカマサラソース
lt: Tikka masala padažai
nl: Tikka masala sauzen

en: Tandoori sauces, Indian-style tandoori sauce
fr: Sauces tandoori, Sauce indienne tandoori
hr: Tandoori umaci
ja: タンドリーソース
nl: Tandoorisauzen